Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-201
City jails; regulation; duties and powers of Jail Standards Board.

The Jail Standards Board shall, each January, and at such other time or times as it may deem necessary, prescribe written rules for the regulation and government of the municipal jails upon the subjects of (1) the cleanliness of the jail and prisoners, (2) the classification of prisoners in regard to sex, age, crime, and also persons with physical or mental disabilities, (3) beds, clothing, and diet, (4) warming, lighting, and ventilation of the jail, (5) the employment of medical and surgical aid, (6) the employment, temperance, and instruction of the prisoners, (7) the intercourse between prisoners and their attorneys and other persons, including access to telephones or videoconferencing as required by section 47-201.01, (8) the discipline of prisoners, (9) the keeping of records of the jail, and (10) any other matters concerning jails and their government as the board may deem necessary.

Laws 1915, c. 208, § 1, p. 462;

C.S.1922, § 3010;

C.S.1929, § 47-115;

R.S.1943, § 47-201;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 12;

Laws 2018, LB776, § 7.